apertium-eo-en.eo.dix
    <pardef n="probj__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>min</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>sxin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ŝin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>gxin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ĝin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>onin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ilin</l> 
        <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="probj_dem__prn">
    <e>
        <i></i> 
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>me</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>you</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>him</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>her</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>it</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>us</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>them</l> 
        <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>this</l> 
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>these</l> 
        <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>that</l> 
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><b/>those</l> 
        <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="probj"><i/><par n="probj__prn"/></e>
